Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2029YH (1) 91 dg/ko H.F. 276 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ STUDY 1 COMMITTEE FOR STATE TRAINING SCHOOL FOR FEMALES UNDER THE AGE 2 OF EIGHTEEN. 3 1. The department of health and human services shall convene 4 a study committee to meet during the 2025 legislative interim 5 to examine the feasibility of establishing a state training 6 school for females under the age of eighteen. 7 2. The study committee shall, at a minimum, examine 8 issues relating to costs, potential locations for the school, 9 potential programs to be offered, and estimated timeline for 10 the school to become operational. 11 3. The membership of the committee shall consist of, at 12 a minimum, a representative from the department of health 13 and human services, a representative from the state training 14 school at Eldora, a childrenâs behavioral health specialist 15 with expertise related to females under eighteen years of age, 16 an educator with experience teaching females under eighteen 17 years of age with behavioral health issues, and an expert 18 with knowledge of providing transitional services to children 19 leaving long-term placement in juvenile correction facilities. 20 4. The study committee shall submit a report with the 21 committeeâs findings and recommendations to the general 22 assembly and to the governor no later than December 15, 2025. 23